Arkansas, session 2025, HB1567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 8-10-305(a), concerning the definition of
"motor vehicle racing facility" in certain rural locations, is amended to
read as follows:
(a) As used in this section, “motor vehicle racing facility” means any
facility designed and used for competitive racing by:
(1) Automobiles automobiles or trucks that are modified for
racing;
(2) All-terrain vehicles as defined in § 27-21-102 or all-
terrain vehicles that are modified for racing; or
(3) Motorcycles or motorcycles that are modified for racing.




*JMB351*
02/21/2025 8:51:42 AM JMB351